Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-302
Formation; articles; where filed.

After the articles of association shall be signed, the same shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court of the county in which such drainage district is located, or if such drainage district is composed of tracts, or parcels of land in two or more counties, then in the office of the clerk of the district court of the county in which the greater portion of such proposed drainage district may be situated.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 1, p. 508;

R.S.1913, § 1797;

C.S.1922, § 1744;

C.S.1929, § 31-401;

R.S.1943, § 31-302.

Articles should be filed in county having larger portion of lands. Petersen v. Thurston, 157 Neb. 833, 62 N.W.2d 68 (1954).